Maine, session 132, LD1129.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 19-A MRSA §4111, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Action by defendant. A defendant may not file a motion to extinguish a final order
issued under this chapter. The court may dismiss a motion to extinguish filed by a
defendant without a hearing and before opposition is filed.
Page 1 - 132LR0794(03)